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DI3ME-03

DTC 12 Fuel Tank Select Relay Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

 Fuel tank select relay
* Open or short in main fuel pump circuit

Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue: )
* Main fuel pump

(a) Fuel tank changeover switch OFF
12 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is low)
(b) Voltage of FPM1 terminal is low
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is high

e Fuel pump relay

« Circuit opening relay

« Short in sub fuel tank forcing driving relay circuit
 Sub fuel tank forcing driving relay

 Short in sub fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-49).

@

2 [ Check voltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU connector and body

NG> Replace fuel tank select relay.

ground.
ON Fuel Tank Changeover | PREPARATION:
Switch is OFF (@) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b)  Turn the ignition switch ON.
‘|DDDDDDDDDDDD@DDDDDDW}HDDDDDDDDDE (¢) Fuel tank changeover switch is OFF.
(0000000000000y0000000)000-0000000
CHECK:
NK/ M Measure voltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU con-
AN nector and body ground, turn the ignition switch ON after 4 se-
[ W) FPM2 (+)
conds or more.
- nossez| OK:

Voltage:0 - 3.0V

0K> Go to step 5.
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3 | Check sub fuel tank forcing driving relay (See page FI-52).

NG Replace sub fuel tank forcing driving relay, and
then go to step 5.

@

4 | Check for short in harness and connector between sub fuel tank forcing driving
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

then go to step 5.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector, and

@

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).

5 CHeckvoltage betweenterminal FPM 1 ofengine ECU connectorand body
ground (See page DI-108, step 1).

0K> Go to step 8.

NG

6 | Check fuel pump relay (Marking: FUEL/PMP) (See page FI-46).

NG> Replace fuel pump relay.
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7 | Check circuit opening relay (Marking: C/OPN) (See page FI-45).

NG> Replace circuit opening relay.

@

8 | Check operation of main fuel pump (See page DI-108, step 5).

HINT:
Ifyouhavenohand -heldtester,andthengotostep9.

OKés tostep 11.

NG

9 | Check main fuel pump (See page FI-7).

NG> Replace main fuel pump.

10 Check for open or shortin harness and connector between main fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and fuel pump relay, fuel pump relay
and circuit opening relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace.
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11 Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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